Arkansas, session 2025, HB1481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The United States Supreme Court has long held that states do
not have to participate in the enforcement or effectuation of federal acts or
regulatory programs; and
(2) The United States Supreme Court has done so four (4) times
in the past thirty-three (33) years and as far back as 1842 in:
(A) Murphy v. NCAA, 584 U.S. 453 (2018);
(B) National Federation of Independent Business v.
Sebelius, 567 U.S. 519 (2012);
(C) Printz v. United States, 521 U.S. 898 (1997);
(D) New York v. United States, 505 U.S. 144 (1992); and
*CEB061*
03-05-2025 10:16:21 CEB061

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1481
(E) Prigg v. Pennsylvania, 41 U.S. 539 (1842).
(b) The General Assembly intends this subchapter to ensure that the
State of Arkansas and its political subdivisions refrain from providing any
assistance or material aid for enforcing federal firearms laws, regulations,
executive orders, or treaties.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 1, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 10 — Anti-ATF Commandeering Act

21-1-1001. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Anti-ATF
Commandeering Act".

21-1-1002. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Elected official” means any person holding an elective
office of any governmental body, whether elected or appointed to the office;
(2)(A) "Material aid and support" means voluntarily providing or
allowing others to use lodging or communications equipment or services,
including social media accounts, data, facilities, weapons, personnel,
transportation, clothing, or other physical assets.
(B) "Material aid and support" does not include:
(i) Providing or allowing the use of medical
treatments or other materials necessary to treat physical injury; and
(ii) Helping individuals escape a serious imminent
risk of life-threatening injury; and
(3)(A) “Public employee” means any person employed by the state
or a political subdivision of the state.
(B) "Public employee" includes a law enforcement officer.

21-1-1003. Aiding federal firearms law enforcement.
(a) The state or a political subdivision of the state shall not
provide material aid and support for enforcing any federal laws, statutes,
regulations, rules, executive orders, treaties, administrative orders, or
ordinances regarding firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition.
03-05-2025 10:16:21 CEB061

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1481
(b) A public employee or elected official shall not knowingly:
(1) Enforce or attempt to enforce any federal law, statute,
regulation, rule, executive order, treaty, administrative order, or ordinance
regarding firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition; or
(2) Refer to the United States Government a violation of federal
law, statute, regulation, rule, executive order, treaty, administrative
order, or ordinance regarding firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition.
(c) A violation of subdivision (b)(2) of this section by a public
employee shall result in the termination of his or her employment.
(d) This section does not prohibit the enforcement of state firearms
laws that comply with Arkansas Constitution, Article 2, § 5.
(e) This act does not prevent law enforcement from using information
obtained from United States Government agencies to enforce state laws.
21-1-1004. Civil remedies.
(a)(1) A person who was subjected to a violation under § 21-1-1003 by
the state may file a claim with the Arkansas State Claims Commission.
(2) In a claim filed under this subsection, the commission shall
award to the complainant if the claim is proved fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) per violation to be approved by the General Assembly as provided in
§ 19-10-215.
(b)(1) A person who was subjected to a violation under § 21-1-1003 by
a political subdivision of the state may bring an action for equitable and
monetary relief in the circuit court of the county in which the violation
occurred, the circuit court of the county in which the person resides, or
Pulaski County Circuit Court.
(2) Sovereign immunity is not a defense to an action brought
under this subsection.
(3) In an action brought under this subsection, the court shall
award the prevailing party, excluding a political subdivision of the state,
reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
(4) In an action brought under this subsection, the court shall
award a plaintiff if they are the prevailing party fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) per violation.

/s/Long

03-05-2025 10:16:21 CEB061